Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-121] Absence without leave. Any
person subject to this chapter who, without authority:

(1) Fails to go to the person's appointed place of
duty at the time prescribed;

(2) Goes from that place; or

(3) Absents the person's self or remains absent from
the person's unit, organization, or place of duty at which the person is
required to be at the time prescribed;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next